Massachusetts, session 194th, S2387.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Massachusetts Department of Transportation is hereby authorized and directed to
erect and maintain two signs on route I-395 in proximity to exit 5 northbound and southbound in
the town of Oxford marking and directing motorists to the birthplace of Clara Barton, founder of
the American Red Cross, teacher, national heroine, and native of Oxford, Massachusetts.
of 1